pt-BR: Sistema de console: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; Playstation 1; PlayStation 2; Playstation 3; Playstation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Outro
ru: Тип консоли: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Другое
hu: Konzolrendszer: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Egyéb
hr-HR: Sustav konzole: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Ostalo
zh-TW: 控制台系統: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; 遊戲小子; Neo Geo; 任天堂 2DS; 任天堂 3DS; 任天堂 64; 任天堂 DS; 任天堂娛樂系統 (NES); Nintendo GameCube; 任天堂 switch; 任天堂 Wii; 任天堂 Wii U; Playstation 1; Playstation 2; Playstation 3; Playstation 4; Playstation 5; 便攜式遊戲機 (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega 土星; 超級任天堂娛樂系統 (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; 其他
es: Sistema de consola: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; Playstation 1; Playstation 2; Playstation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation portátil (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Otros
ko: 콘솔 시스템: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; 닌텐도 스위치; 닌텐도 Wii; 닌텐도 Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; 기타
tr: Konsol Sistemi: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Diğer
vi: Hệ thống điều khiển: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Hệ thống giải trí Nintendo (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation di động (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Hệ thống giải trí Super Nintendo (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Khác
pt-PT: Sistema de consola: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Série XS; Outro
zh-CN: 控制手柄系统: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; 任天堂 2DS; 任天堂 3DS; 任天堂 64; 任天堂 DS; 任天堂娱乐系统 (NES); 任天堂游戏盒子; 任天堂 Switch; 任天堂 Wii; 任天堂 Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; 超级任天堂娱乐系统 (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series S; 其他
fi: Konsolijärjestelmä: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo-viihdejärjestelmä (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; Kannettava PlayStation (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturnus; Super Nintendo -viihdejärjestelmä (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Muu
de: Konsolensystem: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Sonstiges
cs: Systém konzole: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series X; Jiné
pl: System konsoli: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; Playstation 1; Playstation 2; Playstation 3; Playstation 4; Playstation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox z serii XS; Pozostałe
el: Σύστημα κονσόλας: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Άλλο
da: Konsolsystem: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Andet
sl-SI: Konzolni sistem: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Drugo
bg-BG: Система на конзолата: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Система за забавление Super Nintendo (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Други
ro-RO: Sistem consolă: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Altele
sk-SK: Konzolový systém: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Iné
fr: Système de console: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Autre
en: Console system: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Other
th: ระบบคอนโซล: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; อื่นๆ
nl: Consolesysteem: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Andere
ja: コンソールシステム: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; ゲームボーイ; ネオジオ; ニンテンドー2DS; ニンテンドー3DS; NINTENDO64; ニンテンドーDS; ニンテンドーエンターテインメントシステム (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; ニンテンドーWii; ニンテンドーWii U; プレイステーション1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; プレイステーション・ポータブル (PSP); プレイステーション・ヴィータ; セガ ドリームキャスト; セガジェネシス; セガサターン; スーパーニンテンドーエンターテインメントシステム (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; XboxシリーズXS; その他
it: Sistema di console: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; NeoGeo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Sistema di intrattenimento Nintendo (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portatile (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Sistema di intrattenimento Super Nintendo (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Altro
sv: Konsolsystem: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega Genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Annat
nb: Konsollsystem: Atari 2600; Atari 7800; Game Boy; Neo Geo; Nintendo 2DS; Nintendo 3DS; Nintendo 64; Nintendo DS; Nintendo Entertainment System (NES); Nintendo GameCube; Nintendo Switch; Nintendo Wii; Nintendo Wii U; PlayStation 1; PlayStation 2; PlayStation 3; PlayStation 4; PlayStation 5; PlayStation Portable (PSP); PlayStation Vita; Sega Dreamcast; Sega genesis; Sega Saturn; Super Nintendo Entertainment System (SNES); Xbox; Xbox 360; Xbox One; Xbox Series XS; Annen
lt-LT: Žaidimų kompiuterio sistema: „Atari 2600“; „Atari 7800“; „Game Boy“; „Neo Geo“; „Nintendo 2DS“; „Nintendo 3DS“; „Nintendo 64“; „Nintendo DS“; „Nintendo Entertainment System“ (NES); „Nintendo GameCube“; „Nintendo Switch“; „Nintendo Wii“; „Nintendo Wii U“; „PlayStation 1“; „PlayStation 2“; „PlayStation 3“; „PlayStation 4“; „PlayStation 5“; „PlayStation Portable“ (PSP); „PlayStation Vita“; „Sega Dreamcast“; „Sega Genesis“; „Sega Saturn“; „Super Nintendo Entertainment System“ (NES); „Xbox“; „Xbox 360“; „Xbox One“; „Xbox Series XS“; Kita